Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.070

Certificate of disability.

No person shall be retired, as provided in RCW 41.20.060, or receive any benefit from said fund, unless there shall be filed with said board certificate of his or her disability, which certificate shall be subscribed and sworn to by said person, and by the city physician (if there be one) and two regularly licensed and practicing physicians of such city, and such board may require other evidence of disability before ordering such retirement and payment as aforesaid.

[ 2012 c 117 s 25; 1909 c 39 s 6; RRS s 9584.]